Utah statutes.
78B-3-908.   Judicial Council to make rules.

The Judicial Council shall, on or before July 1, 2012, adopt rules and forms to establish uniform procedures implementing the provisions of this part, including:

(1)  additional content of proposed agreements;

(2)  pretrial exchanges and submissions;

(3)  pretrial conferences;

(4)  time limits for jury selection;

(5)  time limits for trial, including presentation of evidence and argument;

(6)  presentation of evidence and testimony; and

(7)  any other procedures necessary to implement this part.



Enacted by Chapter 111, 2011 General Session

